Hawaii, session 2026, SB3190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 132D-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§132D-7  License or permit required. A person shall not: (1)  Import, transport, store, or distribute, including at wholesale or retail, any aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, consumer fireworks, or display fireworks unless the person has a valid license issued pursuant to this chapter; or (2)  Possess any aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, or display fireworks without a valid license to import, store, or distribute aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, or display fireworks, or a valid display permit issued pursuant to this chapter." SECTION 2.  Section 132D-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), any person: (1)  Importing, transporting, storing, or distributing aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, consumer fireworks, or display fireworks without having a valid license as required pursuant to section 132D-7[:] or producing aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, consumer fireworks, or display fireworks without a valid license issued by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives: (A)  Shall be guilty of a class C felony; provided that, notwithstanding section 706-640, the person shall be fined a minimum of $10,000 and not more than $          ; and (B)  Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if the total weight of the aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, consumer fireworks, and display fireworks is twenty-five pounds or more, shall be guilty of a class B felony; provided that the person shall be fined a minimum of $10,000; and (2)  Purchasing, possessing, setting off, igniting, discharging, or otherwise causing to explode aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, or display fireworks without a valid permit required pursuant to sections 132D-10 and 132D-16: (A)  If the total weight of the aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, and display fireworks is fifty pounds or more, shall be guilty of a class B felony; (B)  If the total weight of the aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, and display fireworks is twenty-five pounds or more, shall be guilty of a class C felony; (C)  If the total weight of the aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, and display fireworks is five pounds or more, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and (D)  If the total weight of the aerial devices, articles pyrotechnic, and display fireworks is less than five pounds or if the total weight cannot be determined, shall be fined $300 and subject to proceedings under chapter 291D." SECTION 3.  Section 712-1281, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§712-1281 Forfeiture; fireworks.  In addition to any other penalty that may be imposed for violation of section 132D‑14(a)(1), any property used or intended for use in the commission of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit an offense under section 132D-14(a)(1), or that facilitated or assisted [such] the activity, [and] including any [proceeds]: (a)  Fireworks and related materials; (b)  Transportation vehicles; (c)  Real property used to store or distribute fireworks in violation of section 132D-14(a)(1); (d)  Financial assets derived from or used to facilitate the violation of section 132D-14(a)(1); and (e)  Proceeds or other property acquired or maintained with the proceeds from violation of section 132D-14(a)(1), may be subject to forfeiture pursuant to chapter 712A[.]; provided that any person who reports information leading directly to a forfeiture pursuant to this section shall receive fifty per cent of the total value of the assets subject to forfeiture." SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________